Illinois, session 104th, HB4460.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by adding 5Section 6.14i as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 85/6.14i new)7    Sec. 6.14i. Out-of-network patient transfers. Upon request 8by a patient, a hospital must transfer the patient to the 9requested health care facility, regardless of whether the 10facility is part of the hospital's health care network. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.